Hawaii statutes.
[§431:2D-114] Data calls. Whether
through market analysis, market conduct action, or in response to another
regulatory request, any information provided in response to a data call from
the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, shall be treated as
confidential and privileged. It shall not be subject to subpoena and shall not
be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action.
No waiver of privilege or confidentiality shall occur as a result of responding
to a data call. [L 2007, c 227, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next